Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1598.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 53 O.S. 2021, Section 1.18, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 1.18. The Oklahoma Historical Society shall dispense


funds for historical purposes only as defined provided by paragraph


of Section 6 of this act the Oklahoma Historical Preservation Act.


The Oklahoma Historical Society may enter into contracts with other


state agencies or nonprofit corporations holding a valid exemption


from taxation issued pursuant to Section 501(a) of the Internal


Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, and listed as an exempt

Req. No. 2544 Page 1


organization in Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of


1986, of the United States, as amended, or with individuals or


associations pursuant to statutory requirements.


Funds shall not be applied, donated or used directly or


indirectly for the use, benefit or support of any sect, church,


denomination or system of religion, or for the use, benefit or


support of any priest, preacher, minister, or other religious


teacher or dignitary, or sectarian institution as such.


The Oklahoma Historical Society shall provide opportunity to


organizations to submit written applications to be received and


acted upon by the Oklahoma Historical Society. At the conclusion of


the contract, each state agency, nonprofit corporation, individual,


or association shall provide the Oklahoma Historical Society with


proof of fulfillment of the contract in proper order and must shall


be affirmed on the proper form, provided by the Oklahoma Historical


Society, by the managing officers of the state agency, nonprofit


group, association, or individual making the contract.


SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 53 O.S. 2021, Section 171, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 171. The Oklahoma Arts Council shall dispense funds for


arts purposes only. The Oklahoma Arts Council shall enter into


contracts with other state agencies or nonprofit corporations


holding a valid exemption from taxation issued pursuant to Section


501(a) of the Internal Revenue Code, 1954 of 1986, as amended, and

Req. No. 2544 Page 2


listed as an exempt organization in Section 501(c)(3) of the


Internal Revenue Code, 1954, of the United States of 1986, as


amended. These nonprofit corporations must demonstrate that the


goods and services provided meet the intent of the state policy


provided in this act Section 162 of this title.


Funds shall not be applied, donated or used directly or


indirectly for the use, benefit or support of any sect, church,


denomination or system of religion, or for the use, benefit, or


support of any priest, preacher, minister, or other religious


teacher or dignitary, or sectarian institution as such.


The Oklahoma Arts Council shall provide opportunity, by public


notices, to all organizations interested in providing these goods


and services, who will submit written applications to be received


and acted upon by the Oklahoma Arts Council. At the conclusion of


the contract, each state agency or nonprofit corporation shall


provide the Oklahoma Arts Council with proof of fulfillment of the


contract in proper order and must shall be affirmed on the proper


form, provided by the Oklahoma Arts Council, by the managing


officers of the state agency or nonprofit group making the contract.


SECTION 3. AMENDATORY 53 O.S. 2021, Section 201C, as


amended by Section 1, Chapter 213, O.S.L. 2022 (53 O.S. Supp. 2025,


Section 201C), is amended to read as follows:


Section 201C. A. The J.M. Davis Memorial Commission shall have


power and authority to:

Req. No. 2544 Page 3


1. Appoint and to fix the salaries and duties of the


professional and administrative employees and curators as may be


necessary to carry out the purpose of this act 201A et seq. of this


title;


2. Appoint an executive director who shall serve at the


pleasure of the Commission. A member of the Commission may be


appointed as the executive director; provided, if a member of the


Commission is so appointed, the member shall resign as a member of


the Commission and the vacancy shall be filled in the same manner as


are original appointments;


3. Provide for the proper housing, protection and display of


the J.M. Davis Gun Collection and other historical artifacts; and


4. Enter into contracts for services to be performed in


furtherance of the authorized activities and duties of the J.M.


Davis Memorial Commission with other state agencies or nonprofit


corporations holding a valid exemption from taxation issued pursuant


to Section 501(a) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended,


and listed as an exempt organization in Section 501(c)(3) of the


Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, or with individuals or


associations pursuant to statutory requirements.


B. Funds of the J.M. Davis Memorial Commission shall not be


applied, donated, or used directly or indirectly for the use,


benefit, or support of any sect, church, denomination, or system of


religion, or for the use, benefit, or support of any priest,

Req. No. 2544 Page 4


preacher, minister, or other religious teacher or dignitary, or


sectarian institution as such. The J.M. Davis Memorial Commission


shall provide opportunity to organizations to submit written


applications to be received and acted upon by the J.M. Davis


Memorial Commission. At the conclusion of the contract, each state


agency, nonprofit corporation, individual, or association shall


provide the J.M. Davis Memorial Commission with proof of fulfillment


of the contract in proper order and must shall be affirmed on the


proper form, provided by the J.M. Davis Memorial Commission, by the


managing officers of the state agency, nonprofit group, association,


or individual making the contract.


C. Any agreements or contracts providing for the employment of


persons or to purchase property or equipment or the construction of


any facilities shall not be authorized unless necessary funds have


been appropriated by the Legislature or have been otherwise obtained


from gifts, grants or contributions actually received by the


Commission.


SECTION 4. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 3-136, as


amended by Section 7, Chapter 323, O.S.L. 2023 (70 O.S. Supp. 2025,


Section 3-136), is amended to read as follows:


Section 3-136. A. Beginning July 1, 2024, a written contract


entered into between the Statewide Charter School Board and the


governing board of a charter school or statewide virtual charter


school or a written contract entered into between a sponsor and the

Req. No. 2544 Page 5


governing board of a charter school shall ensure compliance with the


following:


1. Except as provided for in the Oklahoma Charter Schools Act,


a charter school and virtual charter school shall be exempt from all


statutes and rules relating to schools, boards of education, and


school districts; provided, however, a charter school or virtual


charter school shall comply with all federal regulations and state


and local rules and statutes relating to health, safety, civil


rights, and insurance. By January 1, 2000, the State Department of


Education shall prepare a list of relevant rules and statutes which


a charter school and virtual charter school must shall comply with


as required by this paragraph and shall annually provide an update


to the list;


2. A charter school shall be nonsectarian in its programs,


admission policies, employment practices, and all other operations.


A sponsor may not authorize a charter school or program that is


affiliated with a nonpublic sectarian school or religious


institution;


3. The charter contract shall provide a description of the


educational program to be offered. A charter school or virtual


charter school may provide a comprehensive program of instruction


for a prekindergarten program, a kindergarten program, or any grade


between grades one and twelve. Instruction may be provided to all


persons between four (4) and twenty-one (21) years of age. A

Req. No. 2544 Page 6


charter school or virtual charter school may offer a curriculum


which emphasizes a specific learning philosophy or style or certain


subject areas such as mathematics, science, fine arts, performance


arts, or foreign language. The charter of a charter school or


virtual charter school which offers grades nine through twelve shall


specifically address whether the charter school or virtual charter


school will comply with the graduation requirements established in


Section 11-103.6 of this title. No charter school shall be


chartered for the purpose of offering a curriculum for deaf or blind


students that is the same or similar to the curriculum being


provided by or for educating deaf or blind students that are being


served by the Oklahoma School for the Blind or the Oklahoma School


for the Deaf;


4. 3. A charter school or virtual charter school shall


participate in the testing as required by the Oklahoma School


Testing Program Act and the reporting of test results as is required


of a school district. A charter school or virtual charter school


shall also provide any necessary data to the Office of


Accountability within the State Department of Education;


5. 4. A charter school or virtual charter school shall be


subject to the same reporting requirements, financial audits, audit


procedures, and audit requirements as a school district. The State


Department of Education or State Auditor and Inspector may conduct


financial, program, or compliance audits. The Statewide Charter

Req. No. 2544 Page 7


School Board may request that the State Auditor and Inspector


conduct a financial, program, or compliance audit for any charter


school or virtual charter school it oversees. A charter school or


virtual charter school shall use the Oklahoma Cost Accounting System


to report financial transactions to the State Department of


Education. The charter school or virtual charter school shall be


subject to the limitations on spending, including provisions of the


Oklahoma Constitution, for any funds received from the state, either


through the State Department of Education or other sources;


6. 5. A charter school or virtual charter school shall comply


with all federal and state laws relating to the education of


children with disabilities in the same manner as a school district;


7. 6. A charter school or virtual charter school shall provide


for a governing board for the school which shall be responsible for


the policies and operational decisions of the charter school or


virtual charter school. All of the charter school or virtual


charter school governing board members shall be residents of this


state and shall meet no fewer than ten (10) months of the year in a


public meeting within the boundaries of the school district in which


the charter school is located or within this state if the governing


board oversees multiple charter schools in this state or oversees a


virtual charter school. The governing board of a charter school or


virtual charter school shall be subject to the same conflict of


interest requirements as a member of a school district board of

Req. No. 2544 Page 8


education including but not limited to Sections 5-113 and 5-124 of


this title. Members appointed to the governing board of a charter


school or virtual charter school shall be subject to the same


instruction and continuing education requirements as a member of a


school district board of education and pursuant to Section 5-110 of


this title shall complete twelve (12) hours of instruction within


fifteen (15) months of appointment to the governing board and


pursuant to Section 5-110.1 of this title shall attend continuing


education;


8. 7. A charter school or virtual charter school shall not be


used as a method of generating revenue for students who are being


home schooled and are not being educated at an organized charter


school site or by a virtual charter school;


9. 8. A charter school or virtual charter school shall be as


equally free and open to all students as traditional public schools


and shall not charge tuition or fees;


10. 9. A charter school or virtual charter school shall provide


instruction each year for at least the number of days or hours


required in Section 1-109 of this title;


11. 10. A charter school or virtual charter school shall comply


with the student suspension requirements provided for in Section 24-


101.3 of this title;





Req. No. 2544 Page 9


12. 11. A charter school or virtual charter school shall be


considered a school district for purposes of tort liability under


The Governmental Tort Claims Act;


13. 12. Employees of a charter school or virtual charter school


may participate as members of the Teachers’ Retirement System of


Oklahoma in accordance with applicable statutes and rules if


otherwise allowed pursuant to law;


14. 13. A charter school or virtual charter school may


participate in all health and related insurance programs available


to employees of a public school district;


15. 14. A charter school or virtual charter school and their


respective governing boards shall comply with the Oklahoma Open


Meeting Act and the Oklahoma Open Records Act;


16. 15. The governing board of a charter school or virtual


charter school shall notify the sponsor within ten (10) business


days in the instance of any significant adverse actions, material


findings of noncompliance, or pending actions, claims, or


proceedings in this state relating to the charter school, the


virtual charter school, or an educational management organization


with which the charter school or virtual charter school has a


contract;


17. 16. No later than September 1 each year, the governing


board of each charter school or virtual charter school formed


pursuant to the Oklahoma Charter Schools Act shall prepare a

Req. No. 2544 Page 10


statement of actual income and expenditures for the charter school


or virtual charter school for the fiscal year that ended on the


preceding June 30, in a manner compliant with Section 5-135 of this


title. The statement of expenditures shall include functional


categories as defined in rules adopted by the State Board of


Education to implement the Oklahoma Cost Accounting System pursuant


to Section 5-145 of this title. Charter schools and virtual charter


schools shall not be permitted to submit estimates of expenditures


or prorated amounts to fulfill the requirements of this paragraph;


and


18. 17. A charter school or virtual charter school contract


shall include performance provisions based on a performance


framework that clearly sets forth the academic and operational


performance indicators that shall be used by charter school and


virtual charter school sponsors to evaluate their respective


schools. The sponsor may develop a separate performance framework


to evaluate a charter school or virtual charter school that has been


designated by the State Department of Education as implementing an


alternative education program throughout the school. The sponsor


shall require a charter school or virtual charter school to submit


the data required in this subsection in the identical format that is


required by the State Department of Education of all public schools


in order to avoid duplicative administrative efforts or allow a


charter school or virtual charter school to provide permission to

Req. No. 2544 Page 11


the Department to share all required data with the Board. The


performance framework shall serve as the minimum requirement for


charter school and virtual charter school performance evaluation and


shall include, but not be limited to, the following indicators:


a. student academic proficiency,


b. student academic growth,


c. achievement gaps in both proficiency and growth


between major student subgroups,


d. student attendance,


e. recurrent enrollment from year to year as determined


by the methodology used for public schools in


Oklahoma,


f. in the case of high schools, graduation rates as


determined by the methodology used for public schools


in Oklahoma,


g. in the case of high schools, postsecondary readiness,


h. financial performance and sustainability and


compliance with state and Internal Revenue Service


financial reporting requirements,


i. audit findings or deficiencies,


j. accreditation and timely reporting,


k. governing board performance and stewardship including


compliance with all applicable laws, regulations, and


terms of the charter contract, and

Req. No. 2544 Page 12


l. mobility of student population for the virtual charter


school framework.


The sponsor including the Statewide Charter School Board shall


annually evaluate its charter schools or virtual charter schools


according to the performance framework. The results of the


evaluation shall be presented to the governing board of the charter


school or virtual charter school and the governing board of the


charter school sponsor in an open meeting.


B. An applicant or the governing board of an applicant may hold


one or more charter contracts. Each charter school or virtual


charter school that is part of a charter contract shall be separate


and distinct from any other charter school or virtual charter


school. For the purposes of this subsection, “separate and


distinct” shall mean that a charter school or virtual charter school


governing board with oversight of more than one charter school or


virtual charter school shall not combine accounting, budgeting,


recordkeeping, admissions, employment, or policies and operational


decisions of the charter schools or virtual charter schools it


oversees.


C. The charter contract of a charter school or virtual charter


school shall include a description of the personnel policies,


personnel qualifications, and method of school governance. A


charter school or virtual charter school shall not enter into an


employment contract with any teacher or other personnel until a

Req. No. 2544 Page 13


contract has been executed with its sponsor. The employment


contract shall set forth the personnel policies of the charter


school or virtual charter school including, but not limited to,


policies related to certification, professional development,


evaluation, suspension, dismissal and nonreemployment, sick leave,


personal business leave, emergency leave, and family and medical


leave. The contract shall also specifically set forth the salary,


hours, fringe benefits, and work conditions. The contract may


provide for employer-employee bargaining, but the charter school or


virtual charter school shall not be required to comply with the


provisions of Sections 509.1 through 509.10 of this title.


Upon contracting with any teacher or other personnel, the


governing board of a charter school or virtual charter school shall,


in writing, disclose employment rights of the employees in the event


the charter school or virtual charter school closes or the charter


contract is not renewed.


No charter school or virtual charter school may begin serving


students without a contract executed in accordance with the


provisions of the Oklahoma Charter Schools Act and approved in an


open meeting of the governing board of the sponsor or the Statewide


Charter School Board. The governing board of the sponsor or the


Statewide Charter School Board may establish reasonable preopening


requirements or conditions to monitor the start-up progress of newly


approved charter schools or virtual charter schools and ensure that

Req. No. 2544 Page 14


each brick-and-mortar school is prepared to open smoothly on the


date agreed and to ensure that each school meets all building,


health, safety, insurance, and other legal requirements for the


opening of a school.


D. The charter of a charter school or virtual charter school


may be amended at the request of the governing board of the charter


school or virtual charter school and upon the approval of the


sponsor.


E. A charter school or virtual charter school may enter into


contracts and sue and be sued.


F. The governing board of a charter school or virtual charter


school shall not levy taxes or issue bonds. A school district that


proposes a bond shall include any charter school established


pursuant to subsection A of Section 3-132 of this title and located


within the school district in planning conversations regarding the


bond.


G. The charter of a charter school or virtual charter school


shall include a provision specifying the method or methods to be


employed for disposing of real and personal property acquired by the


charter school or virtual charter school upon expiration or


termination of the charter or failure of the charter school or


virtual charter school to continue operations. Except as otherwise


provided, any real or personal property purchased with state or


local funds shall be retained by the sponsor. If a charter school

Req. No. 2544 Page 15


that was previously sponsored by the board of education of a school


district continues operation within the school district under a new


charter sponsored by an entity authorized pursuant to Section 3-132


of this title, the charter school may retain any personal property


purchased with state or local funds for use in the operation of the


charter school until termination of the new charter or failure of


the charter school to continue operations.


SECTION 5. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-2544 MSBB 1/13/2026 11:31:23 AM





























Req. No. 2544 Page 16